Utah statutes.
3-1-24.   Eligible foreign corporations may operate under chapter.

A foreign corporation that can qualify as an association, as defined in Section 3-1-2, may be authorized to do business in this state under the provisions of this act by complying with the laws relating to foreign corporations doing business in the state. It shall pay the same fees and charges as domestic associations. Upon such compliance it shall have all the rights and privileges of like domestic associations.



Amended by Chapter 7, 1977 General Session

